Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1922
Intern licenses; fees; expiration.

The fee for all intern licenses shall be fifteen dollars. The license shall expire twelve months following its issuance. The secretary may renew or extend an intern's license upon a showing of good cause for any period not to exceed six months for a fee of fifteen dollars.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 22;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 74.